Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3A. Interstate Medical Licensure Compact
§ 1420w.
Severability and construction.

The provisions of the Compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the Compact shall be enforceable.

The provisions of the Compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Nothing in the Compact shall be construed to prohibit the applicability of other interstate compacts to which the states are members.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2020.

§ 1420x.
Binding effect of Compact and other laws.

Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with the Compact.

All laws in a member state in conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

All lawful actions of the Interstate Commission, including all rules and bylaws promulgated by the Commission, are binding upon the member states.

All agreements between the Interstate Commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms.

In the event any provision of the Compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member state, such provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2020.